Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1543
Violation of cease and desist order; penalties authorized.

Any insurer who violates a cease and desist order of the director under section 44-1542 may after notice and hearing and upon order of the director be subject to:

(1) A monetary penalty of not more than thirty thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

(2) Suspension or revocation of the insurer's license or certificate of authority.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 25.